fr: Discipline de pratique du foil: Downwind; Freeride; Kitesurf; Pump foil; Race; SUP; Vitesse; Surf; Wake; Autre
cs: Fleretová disciplína: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Ostatní
hu: Szörf-szárny szakág: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Szörf; Wake; Egyéb
el: Κατηγορία foil: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Άλλο
hr-HR: Disciplina floret: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pumpanje; Utrka; SUP; Brzina; Surf; Wake; Ostalo
it: Disciplina del fioretto: Sottovento; Freeride; Kitesurf; Pump; Gara; SUP; Velocità; Surf; Wakeboard; Altro
ro-RO: Disciplină de floretă: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Cursă; SUP; Viteză; Surf; Wake; Altele
sl-SI: Disciplina floret: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Drugo
de: Foil-Disziplin: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Sonstiges
tr: Foil disiplini: Rüzgar altı; Serbest sürüş; Uçurtma; Pump; Yarış; Kürek sörfü (SUP); Hız; Sörf; Wake; Diğer
vi: Bộ môn lướt ván lá kim loại: Lướt xuôi gió; Tự do; Diều; Bơm; Đua; Ván chèo đứng; Tốc độ; Lướt sóng; Lướt ván canô; Khác
da: Foil-disciplin: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Andet
lt-LT: Foilo disciplina: Pavėjui; „Freeride“; Jėgos aitvarai; „Pump“; Lenktynės; Irklentės (SUP); Greitis; Banglentės; Vandenlentės; Kita
pl: Dyscyplina floretu: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Inna
zh-TW: 水翼項目: 順風; 自由滑行; 風箏衝浪; Pump (泵壓); 競速; 立槳 (SUP); 速度; 衝浪; 尾波衝浪; 其他
fi: Vesilautailun laji: Myötätuuli; Freeride; Leija; Pumppu; Kilpa; SUP; Nopeus; Surffaus; Wakeboarding; Muu
zh-CN: 箔材运动项目: 顺风; 自由骑行; 风筝冲浪; 泵压; 竞速; 桨板 (SUP); 速度; 冲浪; 尾波冲浪; 其他
sk-SK: Disciplína s podvodným krídlom foil: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Iné
sv: Foliedisciplin: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Övrigt
pt-PT: disciplina de florete: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Corrida; SUP; Velocidade; Surf; Wake; Outro
en: Foil discipline: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Other
pt-BR: Modalidade de foil: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Outro
th: ประเภทฟอยล์: ดาวน์วินด์; ฟรีไรด์; ไคต์; ปั๊ม; เรซ; ซับบอร์ด (SUP); สปีด; เซิร์ฟ; เวค; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дисциплина за хидрофойл: По вятъра (Downwind); Фрийрайд; Кайт; Пъмп (Pump); Рейс; SUP; Скорост (Speed); Сърф; Уейк; Друга
ru: Дисциплина фойла: Даунвинд; Фрирайт; Кайт; Памп; Рейс; SUP; Спид; Серф; Вейк; Другое
es: Disciplina del hidrofoil: Viento a favor (downwind); Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Otro
ko: 플뢰레 종목: 다운윈드; 프리라이드; 카이트; 펌프; 레이스; SUP; 스피드; 서핑; 웨이크; 기타
nl: Foil discipline: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Overige
nb: Folie-disiplin: Downwind; Freeride; Kite; Pump; Race; SUP; Speed; Surf; Wake; Annet
ja: フルーレの規律: ダウンウィンド; フリーライド; カイト; パンプ; レース; SUP; スピード; サーフ; ウェイク; その他